Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1960
License under Child Care Licensing
Act; denial of license or disciplinary act authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services
may deny the issuance of or take disciplinary action against a license issued
under the Child Care Licensing Act to a participating applicable child care
or early childhood education program for failure to comply with the Step Up
to Quality Child Care Act.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 9.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.